Arkansas, session 2025, SB580.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 14-284-307(c), concerning loans for
purchase of vehicles and equipment for rural fire protection services, is
amended to read as follows:
(c) The loans shall be for such period as may be approved by rule of
the Arkansas Forestry Commission, and in no event may any loan be for more
than three (3) years five (5) years.










*SSS259*
03/31/2025 8:11:55 AM SSS259